Washington statutes.
RCW 36.13.050

County census authorized—Classification to be based on census.

The board of county commissioners shall determine the population of the county based upon such special county census. Based upon such census, it shall enter an order declaring and fixing the population of the county in accordance with such determination, and from and after the entry of the order the county shall be considered and classified for all purposes according to the population thus determined.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.13.050. Prior: 1923 c 177 s 3; RRS s 4200-8.]